Illinois, session 104th, SB2972.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Boat Registration and Safety Act is amended 5by adding Section 5-24 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 45/5-24 new)7    Sec. 5-24. Mandatory liability insurance. 8    (a) It is unlawful for the owner of a motorboat of more 9than 50 horsepower, a motorboat over 21 feet long, or a 10personal watercraft to operate or allow the operation of the 11motorboat or personal watercraft unless it is covered by a 12liability insurance policy that has been issued by an 13insurance company licensed in this State. The insurance policy 14shall be issued in amounts no less than the minimum amounts set 15for bodily injury or death and for destruction of property 16under Section 7-203 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and shall be 17issued in accordance with the requirements of Sections 143a 18and 143a-2 of the Illinois Insurance Code. No insurer other 19than an insurer authorized to do business in this State shall 20issue a policy pursuant to this Section. Nothing herein shall 21deprive an insurer of any policy defense available at common 22law.23    (b) Proof of insurance as required by this Section shall   SB2972 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16617 LNS 30018 b1be produced and displayed by the owner or operator of the 2motorboat or personal watercraft upon request to any law 3enforcement officer or to any person who has suffered or 4claims to have suffered either personal injury or property 5damage as a result of the operation of the motorboat or 6personal watercraft by the owner or operator.7    (c) Except as provided in subsection (d), any operator of 8a motorboat or personal watercraft subject to registration and 9numbering under this Act who is convicted of violating 10subsection (a) is guilty of a petty offense and shall be 11required to pay a fine in excess of $500, but not more than 12$1,000. However, no person charged with violating this Section 13shall be convicted if such person produces in court 14satisfactory evidence that at the time of the arrest the 15motorboat or personal watercraft was covered by a liability 16insurance policy in accordance with subsection (a). The chief 17judge of each circuit may designate an officer of the court to 18review the documentation demonstrating that at the time of 19arrest the motorboat or personal watercraft was covered by a 20liability insurance policy in accordance with subsection (a).21    (d) A person who (i) has not previously been convicted of 22or received a disposition of court supervision for violating 23subsection (a) and (ii) produces at his or her court 24appearance satisfactory evidence that the motorboat or 25personal watercraft is covered, as of the date of the court 26appearance, by a liability insurance policy in accordance with   SB2972 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16617 LNS 30018 b1Section 7-601 of the Illinois Vehicle Code shall, for a 2violation of this Section, pay a fine of $100 and receive a 3disposition of court supervision. The person must, on the date 4that the period of court supervision is scheduled to 5terminate, produce satisfactory evidence that the motorboat or 6personal watercraft was covered by the required liability 7insurance policy during the entire period of court 8supervision.9    An officer of the court designated under subsection (c) 10may also review liability insurance documentation under this 11subsection to determine if the motorboat or personal 12watercraft is, as of the date of the court appearance, covered 13by a liability insurance policy in accordance with Section 147-601 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The officer of the court 15shall also determine, on the date the period of court 16supervision is scheduled to terminate, whether the motorboat 17or personal watercraft was covered by the required policy 18during the entire period of court supervision.